Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.025

Board powers and duties.

(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the board of massage may:

(a) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement massage therapist licensure under this chapter, subject to the approval of the secretary;

(b) Define, evaluate, approve, and designate those massage schools, massage programs, transfer programs, and massage apprenticeship programs including all current and proposed curriculum, faculty, and health, sanitation, and facility standards from which graduation will be accepted as proof of an applicant's eligibility to take the massage licensing examination;

(c) Review approved massage schools and programs periodically;

(d) Prepare, grade, administer, and supervise the grading and administration of, examinations for applicants for massage licensure;

(e) Establish and administer requirements for continuing education, which shall be a prerequisite to renewing a massage therapist license under this chapter; and

(f) Determine which states have educational and licensing requirements for massage therapists equivalent to those of this state.

(2) The board shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approving courses of study in massage therapy and may contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession or in education to assist in evaluating courses of study. The standards and procedures set shall apply equally to schools and training within the United States of America and those in foreign jurisdictions.

[ 2016 c 53 s 2; 2016 c 41 s 2; 2012 c 137 s 4; 2008 c 25 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 254; 1987 c 443 s 10.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2016 c 41 s 2 and by 2016 c 53 s 2, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.

Effective date—2008 c 25: "This act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 25 s 3.]